District of Columbia statutes.
25-509

Minimum fee for transfer of a license to new owner.

The minimum fee for transfer of a license to a new owner shall be $150.

Jan. 24, 1934, 48 Stat. 330, ch. 4, § 16
May 27, 1949, 63 Stat. 135, ch. 146, title V, § 503
Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-157, § 2(d), 27 DCR 5117
May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959
1981 Ed., § 25-509.
1973 Ed., § 25-117.